District of Columbia statutes.
29-1001.04

Purpose and duration of limited cooperative association.

(a)

A limited cooperative association shall be an entity distinct from its members.

(b)

A limited cooperative association may be organized for any lawful purpose, whether or not for profit.

(c)

Unless the articles of organization state a term for a limited cooperative association’s existence, the association shall have perpetual duration.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
This section is referenced in § 29-1001.09.
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 105 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act.